California statutes. Education Code
(2) The school building is used for educational purposes for kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(3) A fossil fuel burning furnace is located inside the school building.

(b) A private or public school that uses a school building for educational purposes for kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that
 was built before the adoption of the 2016 California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), and has a fossil fuel burning furnace located inside the school
 building is encouraged to have a carbon monoxide device installed in the building.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 475, Sec. 2.   (AB 56)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Professional Boundaries Between Adults and Pupils and the Safety of Learning Environments [32100. - 32100.]

32100.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts, schools operated by county offices of education, charter schools, private schools, and state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department be safe and nurturing places for pupils that are free of fear and threats of violence and free of violent crimes and sexual offenses committed by, or intended to be committed by, other pupils, school employees, volunteers, and contractors.

(b) On or before July 1, 2026, each governing board of a school district, county board of education, and governing body of a charter school or private school, and the department, for purposes of state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, shall do both of the
 following:

 (1) Adopt written policies that promote safe environments for pupil learning and engagement, consistent with the legislative intent specified in subdivision (a), and that do both of the following:

(A) Explicitly address professional boundaries (i) between pupils and school employees, adult volunteers, and school contractors, (ii) among and between pupils, and (iii) among and between adults employed, volunteering, or under contract.

(B) Establish appropriate limits on contact during or outside of the schoolday between pupils and school employees, volunteers, and school contractors via social media internet platforms, text messaging, and other forms of communication that do not otherwise include the pupil’s parent or guardian. The policies may vary the limitations based on the age or grade of the pupil.

(2) Adopt written policies, plans, or specifications regarding school facilities, and the furnishing of school facilities, that address classroom and nonclassroom environments to promote safe environments for learning and engagement that are easily supervised.

(c) School districts, county offices of education, and charter schools are encouraged to work with their public entity risk pool joint powers authority or insurance provider to identify and adopt best practices known to prevent violent crimes, injury, sex offenses, and egregious misconduct.

(d) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Sex offense” has the same meaning as defined in Section 44010.

(2) “Small
 school district” means a school district that has fewer than 2,501 units of average daily attendance at the beginning of each fiscal year.

(3) “Violent crime” has the same meaning as defined in Section 32281.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (SB 848)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. School Safety—Public Institutions [32210. - 32254.]



  ARTICLE 2. Willful Disturbance, Public Schools or Meetings [32210. - 32212.]

32210.

Any person who willfully disturbs any public school or any public school meeting is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 83.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

32211.

(a) Any person who is not a pupil of the public school, a parent or guardian of a pupil of the public school, or an officer or employee of the school district maintaining the public school, or who is not required by his or her employment to be in a public school building or on the grounds of the public school, and who has entered any public school building or the grounds of any public school, during school hours, and who is requested either by the principal of the public school or by the designee of the principal to leave a public school building or public school grounds, shall promptly depart therefrom and shall not return thereto for at least seven days. A request that a person depart from a public school building or public school grounds shall be made by the principal, or the designee of the principal, exclusively on the basis that it appears reasonable to the principal, or the designee of the principal to conclude that the continued presence of the person requested to depart would be disruptive of, or would interfere with, classes or other activities of the public school program.

(b) Any person who fails to leave a public school building or public school grounds promptly upon request of the principal of the public school or the designee of the principal made pursuant to subdivision (a) or who, after leaving a public school building or public school grounds pursuant to a request of the principal of the public school, or the designee of the principal, made pursuant to subdivision (a), returns thereto, except pursuant to subdivision (d), within seven days, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished pursuant to Section 626.8 of the Penal Code.

(c) Any person who is requested pursuant to subdivision (a) to leave a public school building or school grounds may appeal to the superintendent of the school district in which the public school is located. That appeal shall be made not later than the second succeeding schoolday after the person has departed from the public school building or public school grounds. The superintendent shall, after reviewing the matter with the principal, or the designee of the principal, and the person seeking ingress to the public school during school hours, render his or her decision within 24 hours after the appeal is made, and the decision shall be binding upon both parties. A decision of the superintendent may be appealed by the person seeking ingress to the public school during public school hours to the governing board of the school district in which the public school is located. That appeal shall be made not later than the second succeeding schoolday after the superintendent has rendered his or her decision. The governing board of the school district shall consider and decide the appeal at its next scheduled regular or adjourned regular public meeting, and the decision of the governing board shall be final.

(d) Where the office of the superintendent of the school district or the office of the governing board of the school district is situated in the public school building or on the grounds of the public school from which a person has been requested, pursuant to subdivision (a), to depart, the person may enter the public school building or the grounds of the public school solely for the purpose of, and only to the extent necessary for, personally making, at the office of the superintendent or the office of the governing board, an appeal pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) The governing board of every school district shall cause to have posted at every entrance to each school and grounds of the district a notice which shall set forth “school hours,” which are hereby defined for the purposes of this section as the period commencing one hour before classes begin and one hour after classes end at any school, or as otherwise defined by the governing board of the school district.

(f) For the purposes of subdivision (a), a representative of a school employee organization engaged in activities related to representation, as defined by Section 7104, shall be deemed to be a person required by his or her employment to be in a school building or on the grounds of a school.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed as preempting any ordinance of any city, county, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 552, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

32212.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that interruption of class time seriously impairs the educational process.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that each governing board of a school district formally address the problem of classroom interruptions and adopt a policy to control those interruptions, consistent with local circumstances and practices.

(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall develop and distribute to each governing board of a school district a model policy for the reduction and control of classroom interruptions, including, but not limited to, intercom and public address system use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Insurance for Athletic Teams [32220. - 32224.]

32220.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Educational institution” means a school district, a community college district, a state university, the University of California, and the State Department of Education special schools.

(b) “Governing board” means the governing board of a school district or community college district, the Trustees of the California State University, and the Regents of the University of California.

(c) “Member of an athletic team” means member of any extramural athletic team engaged in athletic events on or outside the school grounds, maintained or sponsored by the educational institution or a student body organization thereof. “Member of an athletic team” also includes members of school bands or orchestras, cheerleaders and their assistants, pompon girls, team managers and their assistants, and any student or pupil selected by the school or student body organization to directly assist in the conduct of the athletic event, including activities incidental thereto, but only while such members are being transported by or under the sponsorship or arrangements of the educational institution or a student body organization thereof to or from a school or other place of instruction and the place at which the athletic event is being conducted.

Organized rooting sections, student body members who are spectators, and other spectator students, who are not actually participating in the conduct of the athletic event, are not members of an athletic team. Participants in a playday or field day activity occurring occasionally during a school year, in which students of one or more particular grade levels from two or more schools of a school district or community college district participate in athletic contests, are not members of an athletic team. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as prohibiting a governing board from extending the applicability of the provisions of this article to any of those persons, should the governing board elect so to do.

(d) “Student body organization” means any student organization under supervision of the educational institution or its officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

32221.

The governing board of any educational institution, except a school district or community college district and except the State Department of Education special schools as defined in Sections 59000, 59100, and 59200, shall provide for each member of an athletic team insurance protection for medical and hospital expenses resulting from accidental bodily injuries in an amount of at least five thousand dollars ($5,000) for all services for each member of an athletic team, through group, blanket, or individual policies of accident insurance from authorized insurers, or through a benefit and relief association described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 10493 of the Insurance Code. The coverage shall be for the injury to members of athletic teams arising while the members are engaged in or are preparing for an athletic event promoted under the sponsorship or arrangements of the educational institution or a student body organization thereof or while the members are being transported by or under the sponsorship or arrangements of the educational institution or a student body organization thereof to or from school or other place of instruction and the place of the athletic event. However, the Trustees of the California State University and the Regents of the University of California may authorize and require the student body organizations designated pursuant to this section, to be responsible for such medical and hospital expenses in any amount the trustees or the regents may specify, up to two hundred fifty dollars ($250), in which event the insurance protection for the health and accident expenses may include a deductible clause in the same amount.

The governing board of each school district or community college district and the State Department of Education special schools as defined in Sections 59000, 59100, and 59200 shall provide for each member of an athletic team insurance protection for medical and hospital expenses resulting from accidental bodily injuries in one of the following amounts:(a) A group or individual medical plan with accidental benefits of at least two hundred dollars ($200) for each occurrence and major medical coverage of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000), with no more than one hundred dollars ($100) deductible and no less than 80 percent payable for each occurrence.(b) Group or individual medical plans which are certified by the Insurance Commissioner to be equivalent to the required coverage of at least one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).(c) At least one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for all medical and hospital expenses.
Insurance protection in any of the above amounts shall be provided through group, blanket, or individual policies of accident insurance from authorized insurers or through a benefit and relief association described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 10493 of the Insurance Code. The coverage shall be for the injury to members of athletic teams arising while the members are engaged in or are preparing for an athletic event promoted under the sponsorship or arrangements of the educational institution or a student body organization thereof or while the members are being transported by or under the sponsorship or arrangements of the school districts or community college districts or a student body organization thereof to or from school or other place of instruction and the place of the athletic event. Minimum medical benefits under any insurance required by this subdivision shall be equivalent to the three dollars and fifty cents ($3.50) conversion factor as applied to the unit values contained in the minimum fee schedule adopted by the Division of Industrial Accidents of the Department of Industrial Relations, effective October 1, 1966.

The Trustees of the California State University and the Board of Regents of the University of California shall designate any student body organizations the trustees and the regents deem appropriate to bear the entire cost of the insurance under this article, in such proportions as they deem equitable, and shall make appropriate deductions from any student body organization funds held by the institutions, or otherwise take such measures, as will assure the payment thereof. 

The governing boards of the various school districts or community college districts and the State Department of Education special schools shall require that each member of an athletic team have insurance protection as prescribed by this section, with the costs of the insurance protection to be paid either out of the funds of the district or the funds of the student body, or by any other persons on behalf of, the individual team members or students covered by the insurance. In the event that the governing board of a school district or community college district should determine that a member of an athletic team or the parents, guardian, or other person having charge or control of a member of an athletic team are financially unable to pay the costs of insurance protection, then the governing board shall require the costs of the protection to be paid either out of funds of the district or funds of the student body.

The insurance required by this article shall be issued by an admitted insurer, or through a benefit and relief association described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 10493 of the Insurance Code.

The insurance otherwise required by this section shall not be required for any individual team member or student who has insurance or a reasonable equivalent of health benefits coverage provided for him or her in any other way or manner, including, but not limited to, purchase by himself or herself, or by his or her parent or guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

32221.5.

(a) A school district that elects to operate an interscholastic athletic team or teams shall include the following statement, printed in boldface type of prominent size, in offers of insurance coverage that are sent to members of school athletic teams:

“Under state law, school districts are required to ensure that all members of school athletic teams have accidental injury insurance that covers medical and hospital expenses. This insurance requirement can be met by the school district offering insurance or other health benefits that cover medical and hospital expenses.

Some pupils may qualify to enroll in no-cost or low-cost local, state, or federally sponsored health insurance programs. Information about these programs may be obtained by calling ________ [Insert toll-free telephone number].”

(b) The statement described in subdivision (a) shall also be incorporated into any other letters or printed materials, in boldface type of prominent size, that contain the name or logo, or both, of the school district and are sent to members of school athletic teams to inform them of the provisions of this article, or any other applicable provision of state law, regarding the provision of insurance protection.

(c) The statement described in subdivision (a) shall include the toll-free telephone number or numbers for any of the following:

(1) The Healthy Families Program.

(2) Medi-Cal.

(3) Any other comparable toll-free telephone number for a no-cost or low-cost local, state, or federally sponsored health insurance program.

(d) All notices regarding insurance protection for members of athletic teams that are sent to team members are required to be translated pursuant to Section 48985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

32222.

Any claim for accidental bodily injuries described in this article which is subject to, and for which benefits have been paid under, the provisions of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code is excluded from the required coverage and benefits under this article. Recreation activities under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10900) of Part 7 of this division, are excluded from the required coverage and benefits of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 556, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

32223.

The coverage provided under this article shall not exclude additional or broader coverage by an educational institution or its student body organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1011.)
-------------------------------------------

32224.

The insurance coverage provided under this article may contain the following provisions:

(1) School administrative authorities shall certify whether an injured student applying for the insurance benefits is a student of the educational institution and is enrolled as a member of an athletic team.

(2) The injured student, or his parents or guardian, shall notify school administrative authorities of his injury not later than 60 days from the date of injury.

(3) Medical or hospital care or treatment must commence within 120 days from the date of injury.

(4) The period of time for which benefits shall be payable is limited to 52 weeks from the date the student received his first medical or hospital care or treatment. Benefits shall be payable only for such treatment as is given within the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 556, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Communication Devices in Classrooms [32225. - 32226.]

32225.

It is the intent of the Legislature that if federal funding becomes available for the purposes of the article, the governing board of each school district and each county superintendent of schools equip schools with two-way communication devices to be installed in each classroom used by pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is not currently so equipped. For the purposes of this section, classroom includes portable classrooms. The communication devices shall be for the use of teachers or other employees or agents of the school in the event of a medical emergency or violent crime in the classroom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 972, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

32226.

As used in this article, “two-way communication devices” include, but are not necessarily limited to, telephones, intercoms, walkie-talkies, or portable radios.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 972, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Lead-Safe Schools Protection Act [32240. - 32245.]

32240.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Lead-Safe Schools Protection Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1317, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32241.

(a) The State Department of Health Services shall conduct a sample survey of schools in this state for the purpose of developing risk factors to predict lead contamination in public schools. The survey shall include schools that are representative of the state by geographical region and size of enrollment. The schools to be surveyed shall be selected on the basis of their ability to provide data necessary to make scientifically valid estimates of the nature and extent of lead hazards. Risk factors shall include, but are not limited to, location in relation to high-risk areas, age of the facility, likely use of lead paint in or around the facility, numbers of children enrolled under the age of six, and results of lead screening programs established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 105275) of Part 5 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) For purposes of this article, “schools” mean public elementary schools, public preschools, and public day care facilities.

(c) For purposes of this article, “public preschools” and “public day care facilities” mean preschools and day care facilities, respectively, located on public school property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 33.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

32242.

The department shall do all of the following:

(a) Design and implement a strategy for identifying the characteristics of high-risk schools and provide a basis for statewide estimates of the presence of lead in schools attended by young children.

(b) Conduct a sample survey, as described in Section 32241, to determine the likely extent and distribution of lead exposure to children from paint on the school, soil in play areas at the school, drinking water at the tap, and other potential sources identified by the department for this purpose. To the maximum extent possible, limited sample testing shall be used to validate survey results. The department shall compile and summarize the results of that survey and report those results to the Legislature and the State Department of Education.

(c) Within 60 days of the completion of testing a schoolsite, the department shall notify the principal of the school or director of the schoolsite of the survey results. Within 45 days of receiving the survey results, the principal or director, as the case may be, shall notify the teachers and other school personnel and parents of the survey results.

(d) Make recommendations to the Legislature and the State Department of Education, based on the survey results and consideration of appropriate federal and state standards, on the feasibility and necessity of conducting statewide lead testing and any additional action needed relating to lead contamination in the schools.

(e) As deemed necessary and appropriate in view of the survey results, develop environmental lead testing methods and standards to ensure the scientific integrity of results, for use by schools and contractors designated by schools for that purpose.

(f) Evaluate the most current cost-effective lead abatement technologies.

(g) Work with the State Department of Education to develop voluntary guidelines for distribution to requesting schools to ensure that lead hazards are minimized in the course of school repair and maintenance programs and abatement procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

32243.

(a) When a school subject to this article has been determined to have significant risk factors for lead, the school shall be advised of this finding, and the school shall notify parents of the provisions of the Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Act of 1991 (pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 105275) of Part 5 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code). Within 45 days of receiving this finding, the school principal or the director of the schoolsite shall notify the teachers, other personnel, and the parents of the finding.

(b) Subsequent to the implementation by the state of a certification and training program for environmental lead testing and abatement, any school that undertakes any action to abate existing risk factors for lead shall utilize trained and state certified contractors, inspectors, and workers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 34.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

32244.

Lead-based paint, lead plumbing and solders, or other potential sources of lead contamination shall not be utilized in the construction of any new school facility or the modernization or renovation of any existing school facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

32245.

Funding to implement this article shall be provided from the Child Health and Safety Fund created under Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 18285) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, upon appropriation by the Legislature pursuant to Section 18285 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. School Safety and Security [32250. - 32254.]

32250.

The Legislature recognizes that crime, including vandalism, and violence have reached an alarming level at school sites throughout California. The Legislature further recognizes that there is a need for dealing with the complex problems of crime and violence at school sites and for developing effective techniques and programs to combat crime and violence at school sites.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32251.

There is hereby created in the Department of Education the School Safety and Security Resource Unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32252.

The primary functions of the School Safety and Security Resource Unit are all the following:

(a) Identification of exemplary programs and techniques which have been effectively utilized by any county superintendent of schools or in any school district to combat crime and violence in the public schools, and dissemination of information relating to such programs and techniques to county superintendents of schools and school districts.

(b) Provision of technical assistance to county superintendents of schools and school districts which are developing and implementing programs to deal with crime and violence at school sites.

(c) Attempt to ascertain the underlying causes of violence and vandalism at school sites, and dissemination of such information to county superintendents of schools and school districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32254.

The Department of Education shall not be subject to the duties, obligations, and responsibilities prescribed by this article unless funds specifically appropriated for the purposes of this article are available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.3. Pupils’ Rights to Refrain From the Harmful or Destructive Use of Animals [32255. - 32255.6.]

32255.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Animal” means any living organism of the kingdom animalia, beings that typically differ from plants in capacity for spontaneous movement and rapid motor response to stimulation by a usually greater mobility with some degree of voluntary locomotor ability and by greater irritability commonly mediated through a more or less centralized nervous system, beings that are characterized by a requirement for complex organic nutrients including proteins or their constituents that are usually digested in an internal cavity before assimilation into the body proper, and beings that are distinguished from typical plants by lack of chlorophyll, by an inability to perform photosynthesis, by cells that lack cellulose walls, and by the
 frequent presence of discrete complex sense organs.

(b) “Alternative education project” includes, but is not limited to, the use of video recordings, models, films, books, and computers, which would provide an alternate avenue for obtaining the knowledge, information, or experience required by the course of study in question. “Alternative education project” also includes “alternative test.”

(c) “Pupil” means a person under 18 years of age who is matriculated in a course of instruction in an educational institution within the scope of Section 32255.5. For the purpose of asserting the pupil’s rights and receiving any notice or response pursuant to this chapter, “pupil” also includes the parents of the matriculated minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 23.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32255.1.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 32255.6, any pupil with a moral objection to dissecting or otherwise harming or destroying animals, or any parts thereof, shall notify his or her teacher regarding this objection, upon notification by the school of his or her rights pursuant to Section 32255.4.

(b) If the pupil chooses to refrain from participation in an education project involving the harmful or destructive use of animals, and if the teacher believes that an adequate alternative education project is possible, the teacher may work with the pupil to develop and agree upon an alternate education project for the purpose of providing the pupil an alternate avenue for obtaining the knowledge, information, or experience required by the course of study in question.

(c) The alternative education project shall require a comparable time and effort investment by the pupil. It shall not, as a means of penalizing the pupil, be more arduous than the original education project.

(d) The pupil shall not be discriminated against based upon his or her decision to exercise his or her rights pursuant to this chapter.

(e) Pupils choosing an alternative educational project shall pass all examinations of the respective course of study in order to receive credit for that course of study. However, if tests require the harmful or destructive use of animals, a pupil may, similarly, seek alternative tests pursuant to this chapter.

(f) A pupil’s objection to participating in an educational project pursuant to this section shall be substantiated by a note from his or her parent or guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 100.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

32255.3.

(a) A teacher’s decision in determining if a pupil may pursue an alternative educational project or be excused from the project shall not be arbitrary or capricious.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent any pupil from pursuing the grievance procedures in existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 65, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

32255.4.

Each teacher teaching a course that utilizes live or dead animals or animal parts shall also inform the pupils of their rights pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 65, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

32255.5.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, this chapter applies to all levels of instruction in all public schools operating programs from kindergarten through grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 65, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

32255.6.

Classes and activities, conducted as part of a program in agricultural education that provide instruction on the care, management, and evaluation of domestic animals are exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 65, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Interagency School Safety Demonstration Act of 1985 [32260. - 32295.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [32260. - 32262.]

32260.

This chapter shall be known and may be referred to as the Interagency School Safety Demonstration Act of 1985.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1457, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

32261.

(a) The Legislature hereby recognizes that all pupils enrolled in the state public schools have the inalienable right to attend classes on school campuses that are safe, secure, and peaceful. The Legislature also recognizes that pupils cannot fully benefit from an educational program unless they attend school on a regular basis. In addition, the Legislature further recognizes that school crime, vandalism, truancy, and excessive absenteeism are significant problems on far too many school campuses in the state.

(b) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the establishment of an interagency coordination system is the most efficient and long-lasting means of resolving school and
 community problems of truancy and crime, including vandalism, drug and alcohol abuse, gang membership, gang violence, and hate crimes.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to support California public schools as they develop their mandated comprehensive safety plans that are the result of a systematic planning process, that include strategies aimed at the prevention of, and education about, potential incidents involving crime and violence on school campuses, and that address the safety concerns of local law enforcement agencies, community leaders, parents, pupils, teachers, administrators, school police, and other school employees interested in the prevention of school crime and violence.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to encourage school districts, county offices of education, law enforcement agencies, and agencies
 serving youth to develop and implement interagency strategies, in-service training programs, and activities that will improve school attendance and reduce school crime and violence, including vandalism, drug and alcohol abuse, gang membership, gang violence, hate crimes, bullying, including bullying committed personally or by means of an electronic act, teen relationship violence, and discrimination and harassment, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter that the School/Law Enforcement Partnership shall not duplicate any existing gang or drug and alcohol abuse program currently provided for schools.

(f) As used in this chapter, “bullying” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (r) of Section 48900.

(g) As used in this chapter,
 “electronic act” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (r) of Section 48900.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 732, Sec. 2.   (AB 1156)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 732.)
-------------------------------------------

32262.

(a) There is hereby established the School/Law Enforcement Partnership, comprised of the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Attorney General. The duties of the partnership shall consist of all of the following:

(1) The development of programs and policies necessary to implement the provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 32280).

(2) The administration of safe school programs and all training, procedures, and activities conducted pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Cooperation with other states and state and federal agencies on matters relating to school safety.

(b) As used in this chapter, the term “partnership” means the School/Law Enforcement Partnership established by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 828, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conferences [32265. - 32265.]

32265.

(a) The partnership shall sponsor at least two regional conferences for school districts, county offices of education, agencies serving youth, allied agencies, community-based organizations, and law enforcement agencies to identify exemplary programs and techniques that have been effectively used to reduce school crime, including hate crimes, vandalism, drug and alcohol abuse, gang membership and gang violence, truancy, and excessive absenteeism.

(b) The conference may include, but need not be limited to, information on all of the following topics:

(1) Interagency collaboration between schools, agencies serving youth, law enforcement agencies, and others.

(2) School attendance.

(3) School safety.

(4) Citizenship education.

(5) Drug and alcohol abuse.

(6) Child abuse prevention, detection, and reporting.

(7) Parental education.

(8) Crisis response training.

(9) Bullying prevention, including the prevention of acts committed personally or by means of an electronic act.

(10) Threat assessment.

(11) Conflict resolution and youth mediation.

(12) Teen relationship violence.

(13) Discrimination and harassment reporting and prevention, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment reporting and prevention.

(14) Hate crime reporting and prevention.

(15) Reporting and prevention of abuse against pupils with disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 646, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. School Safety Cadre [32270. - 32270.]

32270.
